New Jersey, session 222, S678.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  The Superintendent of State Police shall establish a recovery leave policy applicable to State troopers who present proof of pregnancy.  At a minimum, the recovery leave policy established pursuant to this section shall: (1)   establish at least eight weeks of continuous recovery leave after giving birth, with full pay and benefits, without the recovery leave being considered sick leave or deducted from sick leave balances; and (2)   not subject a trooper to residency restrictions or integrity checks, which may be applicable to sick or other medical leave, during the period of recovery leave. b.    The superintendent shall make available information concerning the recovery leave policy established pursuant to this section on the intranet website maintained by the Division of State Police.  The information shall include, at a minimum, applicable policies and forms that are required to be completed before and after a period of recovery leave is taken; frequently asked questions; and contact information that allows a trooper to inquire about the divisions recovery leave policy. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately